Massachusetts, session 194th, S1822.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 107. (a) The executive office of health and human services and the department of
early education and care, in consultation with MassHealth, the Personal Care Attendant
Workforce Council, 1199SEIU, and SEIU 509, shall develop and establish a 403(b) account, or
another substantially similar individual retirement account program, for personal care attendants,
as defined in section 70 of said chapter 118E, and for family child care providers, as defined in
subsection (a) of section 17 of chapter 15D. Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 15D, sections
70-75 of chapter 118E, or any other special or general law to the contrary, the department of
medical assistance shall be deemed the employer of said personal care attendants for purposes of
of 3

making contributions under this Act and the PCA Quality Workforce Council shall be deemed
the employer for purposes of collective bargaining under this Act, and the department of early
education and care shall be deemed the employer of all family child care providers, as defined in
section 17(a) of chapter 15D, for purposes of this Act.
(b) In developing such individual retirement account program, the executive office of
health and human services and the department of early education and care shall ensure at a
minimum that the retirement security program: (i) Allows all eligible individuals to contribute to
the individual retirement account established under the program through payroll deductions and
other means; (ii) Allows for collective bargaining over and an ongoing stakeholder and
governance role for labor organizations representing eligible workers on the establishment,
implementation, operations, and adjustments of the individual retirement account program; (iii)
Includes an appointed 9-member governance board that shall include at least two representatives
for the labor organization representing personal care attendants and two representatives for the
labor organization representing family child care providers; (iv) Establishes a minimum state
employer contribution to an eligible individuals' retirement account, whereby an eligible
individual’s state employer will contribute a set amount with each paycheck that is over and
above regular wages but that may be a percentage of the employee’s wages; (v) Establishes a
minimum state employer matching contribution rate that provides a dollar-for-dollar matching
state employer contribution equaling 100% of an employee’s contribution but that may be
capped as a percentage of the employee’s own contribution; (vi) Is professionally managed and
administered in an efficient and cost-effective manner, and with no or limited fees charged to
participating individuals; and (vii) Establishes a union run retirement benefit orientation,
including access to financial literacy programs.
of 3

SECTION 2. The executive office of health and human services and the department of
early education and care shall establish the individual retirement account program as outlined
above and procedures for enrollment of personal care attendants, as defined in section 70 of said
chapter 118E and family child care providers, as defined in subsection (a) of section 17 of
chapter 15D, no later than one year from passage of this Act.
of 3